Nebraska, session 109, LB1037.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1037 LB1037
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2602.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2602.05 (1) A person that paid taxes applicable under section
77-2602 on cigarettes sold in an exempt transaction shall be eligible for
a refund of the taxes paid on those cigarettes.
(2) Exempt transactions, for purposes of this section and section
69-2703, are defined as:
(a) Cigarette sales on a federal installation in a transaction that
is exempt from state taxation under federal law; and
(b) Cigarette sales on an Indian tribe's Indian country to its
tribal members where state taxation is precluded by federal law.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the person
seeking a refund of taxes shall submit an application to the Tax
Commissioner providing documentation sufficient to demonstrate (a) that
the cigarettes were sold in a package bearing the correct stamp required
under section 77-2603 or 77-2603.01 and that the stamp was one that
required payment of tax, (b) that the person paid the applicable taxes in
question, (c) that the cigarettes were sold in an exempt transaction, and
(d) that the person has not previously obtained the refund on the
cigarettes. The documentation shall include, in addition to information
necessary to meet the requirements of subdivisions (3)(a) through (d) of
this section and any other information that the Tax Commissioner may
reasonably require, documents showing the identity of the seller and
purchaser and the places of shipment and delivery of the cigarettes. The
Tax Commissioner shall verify the accuracy and completeness of the
required documentation and information before granting the requested
refund.
(4) If a meritorious refund claim under subsection (3) of this
section is not paid within sixty days after submission of the required
documentation, the refund shall include interest on the amount of such
refund at the rate specified in section 45-104.02 as such rate existed at
-2-

LB1037 LB1037
2026 2026
the date of submission of the required documentation.
(5) The Tax Commissioner and an Indian tribe may agree upon a tax
refund formula to operate in lieu of application for refunds under
subsection (3) of this section. The aggregate refund provided to an
Indian tribe under a formula for a year shall not exceed the aggregate
tax paid by entities owned and operated by that tribe or a member of that
tribe on cigarettes sold in exempt transactions on that tribe's Indian
country during that year. Refunds of taxes under subsection (3) of this
section shall not be available for cigarettes sold in exempt transactions
on an Indian tribe's Indian country by an Indian tribe that agrees upon a
refund formula under this subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall
limit the state's responsibility authority to enter into negotiations for
an agreement pursuant to section 77-2602.06 pertaining to the collection
and dissemination of any cigarette taxes or the state's authority to
enter into such an agreement which may otherwise be inconsistent with
this subsection.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2602.06, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2602.06 (1)(a) Upon receipt of a written request from the
governing body of any federally recognized Indian tribe within the State
of Nebraska, the (1) The Governor or his or her designated representative
shall enter into good-faith negotiations for the purpose of executing may
negotiate and execute an agreement with the governing body of any
federally recognized Indian tribe within the State of Nebraska concerning
the collection and dissemination of any cigarette tax or other tobacco
product tax under this section and sections 77-2602.05 and 77-2603.01 or
escrow collected pursuant to section 69-2703, on sales of cigarettes,
roll-your-own, or smokeless tobacco made or sold on a federally
recognized Indian tribe's Indian country. The Governor or his or her
designated representative retains the discretion on whether to execute
such an agreement, but is under a duty to negotiate in good-faith.
-3-

LB1037 LB1037
2026 2026
Negotiations on such agreement shall commence within sixty days after the
Governor's receipt of such written request and shall continue until
either an agreement is executed or the parties jointly declare an impasse
in writing. While negotiations remain active there shall be at least one
negotiation session every ninety days.
(b) The Governor or his or her designated representative shall not
decline to negotiate, terminate negotiations, or unreasonably delay
negotiations under this section based solely or primarily upon a
federally recognized Indian tribe's exercise of its lawful governmental
authority with respect to matters unrelated to the taxation of cigarettes
and other tobacco products, including, but not limited to, the regulation
of cannabis within the tribe's Indian country.
(c) The scope of negotiations under this section includes, but is
not limited to, the collection, allocation, and refund of any cigarette
tax or other tobacco product tax, as well as any amounts paid into or out
of escrow pursuant to section 69-2703 or other statutes enacted to
implement the Master Settlement Agreement.
(d) The existence of obligations arising under the Master Settlement
Agreement or statutes enacted to implement the Master Settlement
Agreement, including escrow requirements under section 69-2703, shall not
on its own constitute a valid basis for declining or unreasonably
delaying negotiations under this section so long as the tribe's proposals
are consistent with federal law and the Master Settlement Agreement.
(2) The agreement shall specify:
(a) Its duration;
(b) Its purpose;
(c) Provisions for administering, collecting, and enforcing the
agreement and for the mutual waiver of sovereign immunity objections with
respect to such provisions;
(d) Remittance of taxes and escrow collected;
(e) The division of the proceeds of the tax and escrow between the
-4-

LB1037 LB1037
2026 2026
parties;
(f) The method to be employed in accomplishing the partial or
complete termination of the agreement;
(g) A dispute resolution procedure;
(h) Adequate reporting and auditing provisions; and
(i) Any other necessary and proper matters.
(3) (2) The agreement shall require tribal taxes to be imposed
equally on all cigarettes and other tobacco products regardless of
manufacturer or brand.
(4) (3) The agreement shall require that all packages of cigarettes
bear either a stamp under section 77-2603 or a tribal stamp under section
77-2603.01.
(5) (4) The agreement may provide for the sale of cigarettes not
included in the directory under section 69-2706, but only if the
agreement requires that such cigarettes bear the tribal stamp under
section 77-2603.01 and only if the agreement includes provisions to
account for escrow deposits on such cigarettes in amounts equal to and in
a manner consistent with the deposits required of manufacturers under
section 69-2703 or otherwise requires payment of escrow by the
manufacturers in accordance with section 69-2703 and pursuant to section
69-2708.01.
(6) (5) An Indian tribe entering into an agreement under this
section shall agree not to license or otherwise authorize an individual
tribal member or other person or entity to sell cigarettes, roll-your-
own, or smokeless tobacco in violation of the terms of the agreement.
(7) Upon receipt of a written request from a federally recognized
Indian tribe within the State of Nebraska, the (6) The state shall may,
in the best interests of the state, enter into good faith negotiations
toward a any future agreement, compact, or treaty with such any Indian
tribe that is consistent with sections 77-2602.05, 77-2602.06, and
77-2603.01.
-5-

LB1037 LB1037
2026 2026
Sec. 3. Section 77-2603.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2603.01 The state may, as part of enter into an agreement with an
Indian tribe entered into pursuant to section 77-2602.06, contemplate
which contemplates the use of a tribal stamp for sales of cigarettes on
an Indian tribe's Indian country in lieu of the cigarette stamp required
under section 77-2603.
Sec. 4. Original sections 77-2602.05, 77-2602.06, and 77-2603.01,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-